Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201681-885
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-885 to 81-885.56 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Real Estate License Act.

Laws 2009, LB30, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 26;

Laws 2016, LB678, § 1.